Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 4 Wage and Hour Regulation Generally
11-4-403. Payment by evidence of indebtedness.

It shall be unlawful for any corporation, company, firm, or person engaged in any trade or business in this state, either directly or indirectly, to issue, sell, give, or deliver to any person employed by the corporation, company, firm, or person, in payment of wages, whether the wages are earned or not, any scrip, token, draft, check, or other evidence of indebtedness payable or redeemable otherwise than in lawful money, at the next regular payday of the corporation, company, firm, or person.

If the scrip, token, draft, check, or other evidence of indebtedness is issued, sold, given, or delivered to the laborer, it shall be construed, taken, and held in all courts and places to be a promise to pay the sum specified therein in lawful money by the corporation, company, firm, or person issuing, selling, giving, or delivering the same to the person named therein or the holder thereof.

The corporation, company, firm, or person issuing, selling, giving, or delivering the evidence of indebtedness in violation of subsection (a) of this section shall, moreover, be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and not more than one hundred dollars ($100). At the discretion of the court trying the action, the officer or agent of the corporation, company, firm, or person issuing, selling, giving, or delivering the evidence of indebtedness may be imprisoned not less than ten (10) nor more than thirty (30) days.

In any suit by any holder of the scrip, token, draft, check, or other evidence of indebtedness or in any prosecution under the provisions of this section, it shall not be required of the plaintiff in the suit or the state in the prosecution to prove that the scrip, token, draft, check, or other evidence of indebtedness was sold, given, issued, or delivered by the defendant in the suit or prosecution to any laborer or employee in payment of wages of the laborer or employee.

The provisions of this section do not apply to coal mines when fewer than twenty (20) men are employed under the ground.

It is lawful for an employer to pay its employees by automatic deposit or by providing a debit card preloaded with the amount of wages.

If wages are paid by providing a preloaded debit card under subdivision (f)(1) of this section, at least one (1) free withdrawal shall be available for the funds for each deposit of wages loaded onto the debit card.

History.

Acts 1907, No. 315, §§ 1, 3, p. 749; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7128, 7130; Pope's Dig., §§ 9114, 9116; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-305, 81-307; Acts 2019, No. 853, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment added (f).

11-4-404. Payment by sale of goods or supplies.

If any corporation, company, firm, or person shall coerce or compel or attempt to coerce or compel any employee in its employment to purchase goods or supplies in payment of wages, whether the wages are earned or not, from any corporation, company, firm, or person, the first-named corporation, company, firm, or person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished as provided in § 11-4-403.

If any corporation, company, firm, or person shall directly or indirectly sell to any employee in payment of wages, whether earned or not, goods and supplies at prices higher than a reasonable or current market value thereof in cash, the corporation, company, firm, or person shall be liable to the employee in a civil action in double the amount of the charges made and paid for any goods and supplies in excess of the reasonable or current value in cash thereof.

The provisions of this section do not apply to coal mines when fewer than twenty (20) men are employed under the ground.

History.

Acts 1907, No. 315, §§ 2, 3, p. 749; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7129, 7130; Pope's Dig., §§ 9115, 9116; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-306, 81-307.

11-4-405. Payment on discharge.

An employer that discharges an employee is required to pay all wages due by the next regular payday.

An employer that fails to make the payment required under subsection (a) of this section within seven (7) days of the next regular payday shall owe the employee double the wages due.

History.

Acts 1889, No. 61, §§ 1-3, p. 76; 1903, No. 155, § 1, p. 272; 1905, No. 210, § 1, p. 537; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7125-7127; Pope's Dig., §§ 9111-9113; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-308 — 81-310; Acts 2019, No. 853, § 7.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment rewrote the section.

Subchapter 5
— Female Employees Generally

11-4-501 — 11-4-506. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter, concerning female employees generally, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 332, § 1. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

11-4-501. Acts 1915, No. 191, § 6; C. & M. Dig., § 7107; Pope's Dig., § 9093; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-612.

11-4-502. Acts 1915, No. 191, § 3; C. & M. Dig., § 7104; Pope's Dig., § 9086; Acts 1943, No. 274, § 1; 1955, No. 257, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-609.

11-4-503. Acts 1915, No. 191, § 8; C. & M. Dig., § 7109; Acts 1921, No. 140, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 9095; Acts 1943, No. 70, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-614.

11-4-504. Acts 1915, No. 191, § 5; C. & M. Dig., § 7106; Pope's Dig., § 9092; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-611.

11-4-505. Acts 1915, No. 191, § 4; C. & M. Dig., § 7105; Pope's Dig., § 9091; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-610.

11-4-506. Acts 1953, No. 217, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-622.

Subchapter 6
— Wage Discrimination

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-4-601. Discrimination on the basis of sex prohibited.

Every employer in the state shall pay employees equal compensation for equal services, and no employer shall discriminate against any employee in the matter of wages or compensation solely on the basis of the sex of the employee.

An employer who violates or fails to comply with the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class C misdemeanor, and each day that the violation or failure to comply continues shall be a separate offense.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 282, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-333, 81-334.

Publisher's Notes.

This section may partially supersede §§ 11-4-607 — 11-4-612.

11-4-602 — 11-4-606. [Reserved.]

As used in §§ 11-4-608 — 11-4-612, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Employee” means an individual who performs services for an employer for wages in a lawful business, industry, trade, profession, or enterprise, and the individual's employment status has been determined by consideration of the twenty-factor test required by the Empower Independent Contractors Act of 2019, § 11-1-201 et seq.

“Employee” does not include a person engaged in domestic service in the home of the employer; in agricultural service, or in temporary or seasonal employment; an employee of any social club, fraternal, charitable, educational, religious, scientific, or literary association, no part of the net earnings of which inures to the benefit of any private individual;

“Employer” means a person, natural or artificial, acting in the interest of an employer directly or indirectly; and

“Employment” means employment of an employee under contract of hire, expressed or implied, written or oral.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 361, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-623; Acts 2019, No. 1055, § 3.

Publisher's Notes.

Sections 11-4-607 — 11-4-612 may be partially superseded by § 11-4-601.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment rewrote (1)(A); substituted “‘Employee’ does not include a person” for “However, it shall not include persons” and substituted “an employee” for “employees” in (1)(B); substituted “means a” for “shall include any” in (2); and substituted “employment of an employee” for “any employment” in (3).

11-4-608. Penalties for violation of §§ 11-4-607 — 11-4-612.

Any employer who violates any provision of §§ 11-4-607 — 11-4-612, or who discharges or in any other manner discriminates against any employee because the employee has made a complaint to his or her employer, the Director of the Division of Labor, or any other person, has instituted or caused to be instituted any proceedings under or related to §§ 11-4-607 — 11-4-612, or has testified or is about to testify in any such proceeding shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) nor imprisoned more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 361, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-628; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5326.

Publisher's Notes.

This section may be partially superseded. See publisher's note to § 11-4-607.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor”.

11-4-609. Administration of §§ 11-4-607 — 11-4-612.

The Director of the Division of Labor shall have the power and it shall be his or her duty to carry out and administer the provisions of §§ 11-4-607 — 11-4-612.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 361, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-625; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5327.

Publisher's Notes.

This section may be partially superseded. See publisher's note to § 11-4-607.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor”.

11-4-610. Wage discrimination between sexes prohibited.

No employer shall discriminate in the payment of wages as between the sexes or shall pay any female in his or her employ salary or wage rates less than the rates paid to male employees for comparable work.

Nothing in §§ 11-4-607 — 11-4-612 shall prohibit a variation in rates of pay based upon a difference in seniority, experience, training, skill, ability, differences in duties and services performed, differences in the shift or time of the day worked, or any other reasonable differentiation except difference in sex.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 361, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-624.

Publisher's Notes.

This section may be partially superseded. See publisher's note to § 11-4-607.

11-4-611. Action to collect unpaid wages.

An employer who violates the provisions of § 11-4-610 shall be liable to the employee or employees affected in the amount of their unpaid wages.

Action to recover the wages may be maintained in any court of competent jurisdiction by any one (1) or more employees.

Any agreement between the employer and the employee to work for less than the wage to which the employee is entitled under §§ 11-4-607 — 11-4-612 shall be no defense to the action.

In addition to any wages recovered, the court in the action shall allow an additional equal amount as liquidated damages plus a reasonable attorney's fee and court costs.

At the request of any employee paid less than the wage to which he or she is entitled under §§ 11-4-607 — 11-4-612, the Director of the Division of Labor may take an assignment of the wage claim in trust for the employee and shall bring any legal action necessary to collect the claim. The director shall not be required to pay any court costs in connection with the action.

Any action to recover wages and liquidated damages based on violation of § 11-4-610 must be commenced within two (2) years of the accrual thereof and not afterwards.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 361, §§ 4, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-626, 81-629; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5328.

Publisher's Notes.

This section may be partially superseded. See publisher's note to § 11-4-607.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in the first sentence of (b)(4).

11-4-612. Employer to keep records.

Every employer subject to §§ 11-4-607 — 11-4-612 shall keep and maintain records of the salaries and wage rates, job classifications, and other terms and conditions of employment of the persons employed by him or her and the records shall be preserved for a period of three (3) years.

The records shall also be made available to the parties and to the court wherein an action to recover unpaid wages under this subchapter is pending.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 361, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-627.

Publisher's Notes.

This section may be partially superseded. See publisher's note to § 11-4-607.

11-4-607. Definitions for §§ 11-4-608 — 11-4-612.